Utah statutes.
70A-9a-340.   Effectiveness of right of recoupment or set-off against
deposit account.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), a bank with which a
deposit account is maintained may exercise any right of recoupment or set-off
against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), the application of this
chapter to a security interest in a deposit account does not affect a right of
recoupment or set-off of the secured party as to a deposit account maintained
with the secured party.
(3)  The exercise by a bank of a set-off against a deposit account is
ineffective against a secured party that holds a security interest in the
deposit account which is perfected by control under Subsection 70A-
9a-104(1)(c), if the set-off is based on a claim against the debtor.
